Utah statutes.
41-1a-1315.   Third degree felony -- False evidences of title and registration.

It is a third degree felony for a person with respect to a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer to:

(1)  fraudulently use a false or fictitious name in an application for registration, a certificate of title, or for a duplicate certificate of title;

(2)  knowingly make a false statement or knowingly conceal a material fact in an application under this chapter;

(3)  otherwise commit a fraud in an application under this chapter;

(4)  alter with fraudulent intent a certificate of title, registration card, license plate, or permit issued by the division;

(5)  forge or counterfeit a document or license plate purporting to have been issued by the division;

(6)  alter, falsify, or forge an assignment upon a certificate of title;

(7)  hold or use a document or license plate under this chapter knowing it has been altered, forged, or falsified; or

(8)  file an application for a certificate of title providing false lien information, when the person named on the application as lienholder does not hold a valid security interest.

